Arkansas, session 2025, HB1208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-36-303(1)(A), concerning the definition
of "claimant agency" applicable to setoffs against state tax refunds, is
amended to add additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(xxvi) Arkansas Judicial Retirement System; and
(xxvii) State Police Retirement System.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-36-303(2)(H), concerning the definition
of "debt" applicable to setoffs against state tax refunds, is amended to read
as follows:
(H) Any overpayment of a monthly benefit or lump sum from
a state retirement system administered by the Arkansas Public Employees'
*LJH052*
01/23/2025 9:54:15 AM LJH052

HB1208
Retirement System;



































01/23/2025 9:54:15 AM LJH052